Hawaii statutes.
§150A-14 Penalty. (a) Any person who
violates any provision of this chapter other than sections 150A-5, 150A-6(3),
and 150A-6(4) or who violates any rule adopted under this chapter other than
those rules involving an animal that is prohibited or a plant, animal, or
microorganism that is restricted, without a permit, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and fined not less than $100. The provisions of section 706-640
notwithstanding, the maximum fine shall be $10,000. For a second offense
committed within five years of a prior offense, the person or organization shall
be fined not less than $500 and not more than $25,000.

(b) Any person who violates section 150A-5
shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor and fined not less than $50 and not more
than $5,000. For a second offense committed within five years of a prior
offense, the person may be fined not less than $250 and not more than $15,000.

(c) Any person who:

(1) Violates section 150A-6(3) or 150A-6(4), or owns
or intentionally transports, possesses, harbors, transfers, or causes the
importation of any snake or other prohibited animal seized under section
150A-7(b), or whose violation involves an animal that is prohibited or a plant,
animal, or microorganism that is restricted, without a permit, shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of not less than $5,000, but not more
than $20,000;

(2) Intentionally transports, harbors, or imports
with the intent to propagate, sell, or release any animal that is prohibited or
any plant, animal, or microorganism that is restricted, without a permit, shall
be guilty of a class C felony and subject to a fine of not less than $50,000,
but not more than $200,000; or

(3) Intentionally imports, possesses, harbors,
transfers, or transports, including through interisland or intraisland
movement, with the intent to propagate, sell, or release, any pest designated
by statute or rule, unless otherwise allowed by law, shall be guilty of a class
C felony and subject to a fine of not less than $50,000, but not more than
$200,000.

(d) Whenever a court sentences a person or
organization pursuant to subsection (a) or (c) for an offense which has
resulted in the escape or establishment of any pest and caused the department
to initiate a program to capture, control, or eradicate that pest, the court
shall also require that the person or organization pay to the state general
fund an amount of money to be determined in the discretion of the court upon
advice of the department, based upon the cost of the development and implementation
of the program.

(e) The department may, at its discretion,
refuse entry, confiscate, or destroy any prohibited articles or restricted
articles that are brought into the State without a permit issued by the
department, or order the return of any plant, fruit, vegetable, or any other
article infested with pests to its place of origin or otherwise dispose of it
or such part thereof as may be necessary to comply with this chapter. Any
expense or loss in connection therewith shall be borne by the owner or the
owner's agent.

(f) Any person or organization that
voluntarily surrenders any prohibited animal or any restricted plant, animal,
or microorganism without a permit issued by the department, prior to the
initiation of any seizure action by the department, shall be exempt from the
penalties of this section.

(g) For purposes of this section,
"intent to propagate" shall be presumed when the person in question
is found to possess, transport, harbor, or import:

(1) Any two or more animal specimens of the opposite
sex that are prohibited or restricted, without a permit, or are a pest
designated by statute or rule;

(2) Any three or more animal specimens of either sex
that are prohibited or restricted, without a permit, or are a pest designated
by statute or rule;

(3) Any plant or microorganism having the inherent
capability to reproduce and that is restricted, without a permit; or

(4) Any specimen that is in the process of
reproduction. [L 1985, c 133, §9; am L 1990, c 243, §7; am L 1991, c 104, §2;
am L 1992, c 229, §5; am L 1998, c 222, §1; am L 2000, c 211, §§8 to 10; am L
2008, c 101, §2; am L 2010, c 128, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next